Utah statutes.
63H-5-105.   Officer or employee -- No forfeiture of office or employment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an officer or employee of this state does not forfeit the office or employment with the state by reason of acceptance of membership on the authority or service on it.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

